District of Columbia statutes.
Not funded

22-1841

Data collection and dissemination.

[Not funded].

History

Oct. 23, 2010, D.C. Law 18-239, § 111, 57 DCR 5405

Editor's Notes

Subsection (e) of this section, states that this section shall not apply until its fiscal effect is included in an approved budget and financial plan.

The Budget Director of the Council of the District of Columbia has determined, as of February 15, 2012, that the fiscal effect of this section has not been included in an approved budget and financial plan. Therefore, the provisions of this section, enacted by Law 17-146, are not in effect.